Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-459
Effect of failure to qualify.

(1) A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has in effect a statement of foreign qualification.

(2) The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to have in effect a statement of foreign qualification does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(3) A limitation on personal liability of a partner is not waived solely by transacting business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification.

(4) If a foreign limited liability partnership transacts business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification, the Secretary of State is its agent for service of process with respect to a right of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 59.